ckt.rules.lexc
LEXICON N-DERIV-Ic
@D.CASE@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@{·%} # ;
: CASES-OBL ;
: CASES-ANIM ;

LEXICON N-DERIV-III
@D.CASE@%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%>ын # ;
: CASES-OBL ;
: CASES-ANIM ;



LEXICON ADV
%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON INTJ
%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON PTCP
%<ptcp%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ          ! ?
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON PART
%<part%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Punctuation

%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
…%<sent%>:… # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%-%<guio%>:%-%- # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%−%<guio%>:%− # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;
